Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.558

Judicial review of facts confined to record.

Judicial review of disputed issues of fact shall be conducted by the court without a jury and must be confined to the agency record for judicial review as defined by this chapter, supplemented by additional evidence taken pursuant to this chapter.

[ 1988 c 288 s 513.]